District of Columbia statutes.
44-1102.02

Repealed

Establishment of the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 202, 43 DCR 4962
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.2.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
Chief Procurement Officer qualification: Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 12-xxx (D.C. Act 12-249) provided that nothing in that act shall affect the operations of the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation pursuant to this chapter.